Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.03
Certificate of need, defined.

Certificate of need means a written authorization by the department for a person to implement the project under review.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5806;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 7.